Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2310
Gas or hazardous liquid underground pipeline facility, defined.

Gas or hazardous liquid underground pipeline facility shall mean any underground facility used or intended for use in the transportation of gas or the treatment of gas or used or intended for use in the transportation of hazardous liquids including petroleum or petroleum products.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 10.